California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) This section does not limit existing contract law, including, but not limited to, that it does not prevent a freelance worker from enforcing an oral contract or recovering under the doctrine of promissory estoppel. Notwithstanding a refusal by the hiring party to provide a written contract as required by subdivision (a), the following may be evidence that a contract was formed between the parties:

(1) The hiring party made representations to the freelance worker regarding the rate for services to be performed.

(2) The freelance worker provided in writing any document to the hiring party, including email, text message, or other electronic communication, a summary of the rate and work to be performed prior to performing the work.

(3) The freelance worker performed the work that the freelance worker understood was to be performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18104.

A waiver of any provision in this part shall be deemed contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18105.

A hiring party shall not discriminate or take any adverse action against a freelance worker that penalizes a freelance worker for, or is reasonably likely to deter a freelance worker from, taking any of the following actions:

(a) Opposing any practice prohibited by this part.

(b) Participating in proceedings related to the enforcement of this part.

(c) Seeking to enforce rights provided by this part.

(d) Otherwise asserting or attempting to assert rights provided by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18106.

(a) An aggrieved freelance worker or a public prosecutor may bring a civil action to enforce this part.

(b) A prevailing plaintiff in an action alleging a violation of this part is entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, injunctive relief, and any other remedies deemed appropriate by the court. Damages shall be awarded to an aggrieved freelance worker as follows:

(1) If the freelance worker requested a written contact prior to commencing work under the contract and the hiring party refused in violation of Section 18103, the freelance worker shall be awarded an additional one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) If the hiring party failed to pay the freelance worker the contracted compensation by the time required under Section 18102, the freelance worker shall be awarded damages up to twice the amount that remained unpaid at the time payment was due. If the freelance worker requested a written contract prior to commencing work under the contract and the hiring party refused in violation of Section 18103, the amount unpaid shall be determined by the rate the freelance worker reasonably understood to apply to the work.

(3) If the hiring party violates any other provision of this part, the freelance worker may be awarded damages equal to the value of the contract or the work performed, whichever is greater.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18107.

This part applies only to contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. SPECIAL BUSINESS REGULATIONS [18400. - 22949.92.2.]



CHAPTER 1. Automobiles [18400. - 18413.]

18400.

This chapter may be cited as the Automobile Dealers Anti-coercion Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18401.

The provisions of this chapter are cumulative of each other and of any other provision of law relating to the same subject in effect September 15, 1935.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18402.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, trustee, receiver or assignee for the benefit of creditors.

(b) “Sell,” “sold,” “buy,” and “purchase” include exchange, barter, gift, and offer of contract to sell or buy.

(c) “Manufacturer” means (i) any person who is engaged, directly or indirectly, in the manufacture of motor vehicles, and (ii) any other person directly or indirectly owned by him who is engaged in the sale or distribution of motor vehicles or any interest therein at wholesale.

(d) “Retailer” means any person who is engaged or who intends to engage in the business of selling motor vehicles at retail in this state.

(e) “Lender” means any person other than an automobile dealer or automobile distributor who is engaged in the business of financing the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or of buying conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases on motor vehicles sold at retail within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18403.

It is unlawful for a manufacturer to sell or contract to sell motor vehicles to a retailer on the condition or with an agreement or understanding, either express or implied, that the retailer shall finance the purchase or sale of motor vehicles only with or through a designated person or class of persons or shall sell and assign the conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases arising from the sale of motor vehicles only to a designated person or class of persons, when the effect of the condition, agreement or understanding so entered into may be to lessen competition, or tend to create a monopoly in the person or class of persons designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18404.

Any threat, express or implied, made to a retailer by a manufacturer that the manufacturer will cease to sell, or refuse to contract to sell, or will terminate a contract to sell, motor vehicles to the retailer, unless such retailer finances the purchase or sale of motor vehicles only with or through a designated person or class of persons or sells and assigns the conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages, or leases arising from his retail sales of motor vehicles only to a designated person or class of persons is prima facie evidence that the manufacturer has sold or intends to sell motor vehicles on the condition or with the agreement or understanding prohibited by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18405.

Any threat, express or implied, made to a retailer by any person, or any agent of any such person, who is engaged in the business of financing the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or of buying conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases on motor vehicles in this State and is affiliated with or controlled by a manufacturer that such manufacturer will terminate his contract with or cease to sell motor vehicles to such retailer unless such retailer finances the purchase or sale of motor vehicles only with or through a designated person or class of persons or sells and assigns the conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases arising from his retail sale of motor vehicles only to such person so engaged in financing the purchase or sale of motor vehicles or in buying conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases on motor vehicles, shall be presumed to be made at the direction of and with the authority of such manufacturer, and is prima facie evidence that the manufacturer has sold or intends to sell the motor vehicles on the condition or with the agreement or understanding prohibited by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18406.

It is unlawful for any manufacturer to pay or give or to contract to pay or give any subsidy to any lender or to discriminate in favor of or against any lender if the effect of any such subsidy or discrimination may be to lessen competition or tend to create a monopoly in the person or class of persons who accepts the subsidy or who are benefited by the discrimination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18407.

It is unlawful for any lender to accept or contract or agree to accept either directly or indirectly any subsidy or the benefit resulting from any discrimination made unlawful by this chapter from any manufacturer if the effect of the acceptance of any such subsidy or benefit may be to lessen competition or tend to create a monopoly in the person or class of persons who accepts such subsidy or who is benefited by such discrimination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18408.

It is unlawful for any person other than an automobile dealer or automobile distributor who accepts either directly or indirectly any subsidy or the benefit resulting from any discrimination made unlawful by this chapter or contracts either directly or indirectly to accept any such subsidy or benefit to finance or attempt to finance the purchase or sale of any motor vehicle or buy or attempt to buy any conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases on motor vehicles sold at retail in this State thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18409.

Any contract or agreement in violation of the provisions of this chapter is void and is not enforceable at law or in equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18410.

Upon a violation of this chapter by any corporation or association the Attorney General or the district attorney of the proper county shall institute proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction for the forfeiture of charter rights, franchises or privileges and powers exercised by such corporation or association, and for the dissolution of the corporation or association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18411.

Every foreign corporation or association, exercising any of the powers, franchises or functions of a corporation in this State which violates this chapter, is hereby denied those powers, franchises or functions and is prohibited from doing any business in this State. The Attorney General shall enforce this provision by bringing proper proceedings. The Secretary of State may revoke the license of any such corporation or association heretofore authorized to do business in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18412.

(a) Any person who violates this chapter, any person who is a party to any agreement or understanding, or to any contract prescribing any condition prohibited by this chapter, any employee, agent or officer of any such person who participates in making, executing, enforcing, performing or in urging, aiding or abetting in the performance of any such contract, condition, agreement or understanding, any person who pays or gives or contracts to pay or give any thing or service of value prohibited by this chapter, and any person who accepts or contracts to accept any thing or service of value prohibited by this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Each day’s violation of this provision constitutes a separate offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

18413.

(a) In addition to the criminal and civil penalties herein provided, any person who is injured in his business or property by reason of anything declared to be unlawful by this chapter may sue therefor in any court having jurisdiction in the county where the defendant resides or is found, or any agent resides or is found, or where service may be obtained, without respect to the amount in controversy, and recover twofold the damages sustained by him, and the costs of suit.

(b) Whenever it appears to the court before which any proceedings under this chapter may be pending, that the ends of justice require that other parties be brought before the court, the court may cause them to be made parties defendant and summoned, whether or not they reside in the county where such action is pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1a. Automobile Dealers [18450. - 18451.]

18450.

It is a misdemeanor, in connection with the sale of a motor vehicle by a person engaged in the business of selling motor vehicles at retail, for such person to accept assignment of an insurance policy, or rights thereunder, pertaining to any motor vehicle traded in by the purchaser, unless all amounts realized on such policy or rights by such person be credited by the dealer to the buyer on the next monthly payment due or same shall be refunded to the buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

18451.

The purchaser of a motor vehicle may recover from the seller in a civil action three times the amount realized on any insurance policy, or rights thereunder, assignment of which has been accepted in violation of Section 18450.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Boxing, Wrestling, and Martial Arts [18600. - 18888.12.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [18600. - 18618.]

18600.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Boxing Act or the State Athletic Commission Act.

Whenever a reference is made to the Boxing Act or the State Athletic Commission Act by the provisions of any statute, it is to be construed as referring to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 465, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18601.

The Legislature may amend, revise, or supplement any part of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18602.

(a) Except as provided in this section, there is in the Department of Consumer Affairs the State Athletic Commission, which consists of seven members. Five members shall be appointed by the Governor, one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

The members of the commission appointed by the Governor are subject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant to Section 1322 of the Government Code.

No person who is currently licensed, or who was licensed within the last two years, under this chapter may be appointed or reappointed to, or serve on, the commission.

(b) In appointing commissioners under this
 section, the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Speaker of the Assembly shall make every effort to ensure that at least four of the members of the commission shall have experience and demonstrate expertise in one of the following areas:

(1) A licensed physician or surgeon having expertise or specializing in neurology, neurosurgery, head trauma, or sports medicine. Sports medicine includes, but is not limited to, physiology, kinesiology, or other aspects of sports medicine.

(2) Financial management.

(3) Public safety.

(4) Past experience in the activity regulated by this chapter, either as a contestant, a referee or official, a promoter, or a venue operator.

(c) Each member of
 the commission shall be appointed for a term of four years. All terms shall end on January 1. Vacancies occurring prior to the expiration of the term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. No commission member may serve more than two consecutive terms.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, members first appointed shall be subject to the following terms:

(1) The Governor shall appoint two members for two years, two members for three years, and one member for four years.

(2) The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint one member for four years.

(3) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one member for four years.

(e) (1) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 486, Sec. 1.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18602.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the State Athletic Commission in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18602.5.

(a) The commission shall adopt and submit a strategic plan to the Governor and the Legislature on or before September 30, 2008. The commission shall also submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature on the status of the adoption of the strategic plan during the commission’s next regularly scheduled sunset review after January 1, 2007. The strategic plan shall include, but shall not be limited to, efforts to resolve prior State Athletic Commission deficiencies in the following areas:

(1) Regulation of the profession, what fees should be paid for this regulation, and the structure and equity of the fees charged.

(2) The effect and appropriateness of contracts made pursuant to Section 18828.

(3) Costs to train ringside physicians, referees, timekeepers, and judges.

(4) Steps that need to be taken to ensure sufficient sources of revenue and funding.

(5) Necessity for review and modification of organizational procedures, the licensing process, and the complaint process.

(6) Outdated information technology.

(7) Unorganized and improper accounting.

(8) Miscalculations at events, a lack of technology to record proper calculations, and funding issues.

(9) The health and safety of the participants and the public in attendance at events regulated under this chapter, including costs of examinations under Section 18711.

(b) The commission shall solicit input from the public, the State Auditor, the Little Hoover Commission, the Center for Public Interest Law, and others as necessary in preparing and adopting the strategic plan.

(c) The commission shall report on progress in implementing the strategic plan to the Director of Consumer Affairs, the Governor, and the Legislature on or before September 30, 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 465, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18604.

The appointing authority may remove any member of the commission for causes specified in Section 106.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18605.

A majority of the appointed members of the commission constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of those commissioners present at a meeting of the commission constituting at least a quorum is necessary to render a decision or pass a motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 224.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

18606.

The members of the commission shall elect one of their number as the chair and another member as the vice-chair. The chair and vice-chair shall be elected at the first meeting of each calendar year or when a vacancy exists.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18607.

Each member of the commission shall receive a per diem and necessary travel expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18608.

The commission is subject to all of the provisions of Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) and for the purposes of that division shall be deemed to be a board, except for the purposes of Section 102 the commission shall not be deemed to be a board created by an initiative act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18610.

The commission shall adopt a seal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18611.

The commission shall adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, rules and regulations as may be necessary to enable it to carry out the laws relating to boxing and the martial arts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 757, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18613.

(a) (1) The commission shall appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the commission and vested in the executive officer by this chapter. The appointment of the executive officer is subject to the approval of the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(2) The commission may employ a chief athletic inspector. If the commission employs a chief athletic inspector, the chief athletic inspector shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the commission and authorized by the executive officer related to the regulation of events under this chapter.

(3) The
 commission may employ an assistant chief athletic inspector. If the commission employs an assistant chief athletic inspector, the assistant chief athletic inspector shall assist the chief athletic inspector in exercising the powers and performing the duties delegated by the commission and authorized by the executive officer related to the regulation of events under this chapter.

(4) The commission may employ in accordance with Section 154 other personnel as may be necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(b) (1) (A) Pursuant to Section 820.2 of the Government Code, the executive officer appointed pursuant to this section shall not be liable for discretionary acts taken while performing duties pursuant to this chapter.

(B) This paragraph is declaratory of existing
 law and does not constitute a change in existing law.

(2) The approval of contests and the assignment of officials for contests by the executive officer under this chapter shall be considered discretionary acts pursuant to Section 820.2 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18615.

No inspector shall be assigned to regulate an event under the authority or jurisdiction of the commission, who, within the preceding six months, has not participated in an inspectors’ clinic or received formal training, at which the laws and rules of the commission and related problems have been discussed. The commission is authorized to pay the necessary traveling expenses of an inspector while in attendance at the clinic or formal training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18618.

The commission shall furnish to the Governor and the Legislature a report, on or before July 30, 2012, on the following:

(a) The condition of the State Athletic Commission Neurological Examination Account. This report shall include the amount of the assessment collected from each promoter pursuant to Section 18711, the purposes for which moneys in the account are expended, and findings and recommendations on the amounts, appropriateness, and effectiveness of these assessments. The report shall also include a recommendation on the viability and need for creating a medical database that would be used for identifying trends in medical records and data associated with injuries and deaths related to
 competing.

(b) The condition of the Boxers’ Pension Fund. This report shall include a recommendation on whether the fund should be continued and, if so, whether it should be expanded to include all athletes licensed under this chapter and appropriate fees paid into the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 448, Sec. 31.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [18620. - 18631.]

18620.

The definitions contained in this article shall be for terms used in this chapter and shall be applicable unless otherwise specifically provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18621.

“Commission” means the State Athletic Commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18622.

The words “club” and “promoter” are synonomous, may be used interchangeably, and mean a corporation, partnership, association, individual, or other organization which conducts, holds, or gives a boxing or martial arts contest, match, or exhibition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 757, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18623.

A professional or amateur boxer or martial arts fighter is one who engages in a boxing or martial arts contest and who possesses fundamental skills in his or her respective sport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 757, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18624.

“Committee” means an advisory committee on medical and safety standards created by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1095, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18625.

(a) As described in the specific provisions of the act, whether referring to a professional or amateur contest or match, the terms “contest” and “match” are synonymous, may be used interchangeably, include boxing, kickboxing, and martial arts exhibitions, and mean a fight, prizefight, boxing contest, pugilistic contest, kickboxing contest, martial arts contest, or sparring match, between two or more persons, where full contact is used or intended that may result or is intended to result in physical harm to the opponent.

 (b) (1) An amateur contest or match includes a contest or match where full contact is used, even if
 unintentionally.

(2) An amateur contest or match does not include light contact karate, tae kwon do, judo, or any other light contact martial arts as approved by the commission and recognized by the International Olympic Committee as an Olympic sport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1186)   Effective October 3, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18627.

(a) “Martial arts” means any form of karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, kickboxing or any combination of full contact martial arts, including mixed martial arts, or self-defense conducted on a full contact basis where a weapon is not used.

(b) “Kickboxing” means any form of boxing in which blows are delivered with the hand and any part of the leg below the hip, including the foot.

(c) “Full contact” means the use of physical force in a martial arts contest that may result or is intended to result in physical harm to the opponent, including any contact that does not meet the definition of
 light contact or noncontact.

(d) “Light contact” means the use of controlled martial arts techniques whereby no contact to the face is permitted and no contact is permitted which may result or is intended to result in physical harm to the opponent.

(e) “Noncontact” means that no contact occurs between either contestant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.   (AB 1186)   Effective October 3, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18628.

“Manager” means any person who does any of the following:

(a) By contract, agreement, or other arrangement with any person, undertakes or has undertaken to represent in any way the interest of any professional boxer, or martial arts fighter in procuring, or with respect to the arrangement or conduct of, any professional contest in which the boxer or fighter is to participate as a contestant; except that the term “manager” shall not be construed to mean any attorney licensed to practice in this state whose participation in these activities is restricted to representing the legal interests of a professional boxer or fighter as a client. Otherwise, an attorney shall be licensed as a manager in order to engage in any of the activities described in this section.

(b) Directs or controls the professional boxing or martial arts activities of any professional boxer or martial arts fighter.

(c) Receives or is entitled to receive more than 10 percent of the gross purse of any professional boxer or martial arts fighter for any services relating to such person’s participation in a professional contest.

(d) Is an officer, director, shareholder, or member of any corporation or organization which receives, or is entitled to receive more than 10 percent of the gross purse of any professional boxer or martial arts fighter for any services relating to the person’s participation in a professional contest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18629.

“School, college, or university” means a secondary school, the University of California, a California State University, public community college, or any other private, postsecondary educational institution meeting the requirements of Section 94739, or Article 8 (commencing with Section 94900) or Article 9 (commencing with Section 94915) of Chapter 7 of Part 59 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18630.

“Proprietary interest” means any membership, coownership, stock ownership, legal or beneficial interest, profit-sharing arrangement, or other proprietary interest, designated arranged or held, directly or indirectly in any form.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18631.

“License” as used in this chapter also includes a “permit”.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Jurisdiction, Licenses, and Exemptions [18640. - 18657.]

18640.

The commission has the sole direction, management, control of, and jurisdiction over all professional and amateur boxing, professional and amateur kickboxing, all forms and combinations of forms of full contact martial arts contests, including mixed martial arts, and matches or exhibitions conducted, held, or given within this state. No event shall take place without the prior approval of the commission. No person shall engage in the promotion of, or participate in, a boxing or martial arts contest, match, or exhibition without a license, and except in accordance with this chapter and the rules adopted hereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18640.5.

(a) The commission, at its regularly scheduled meetings, shall invite testimony from boxing stakeholders to identify actions that may lead to greater opportunities for its licensees to participate in major professional championship boxing contests in the State of California. The commission shall invite testimony that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) What cooperative actions may be taken by the private sector boxing stakeholders that may lead to greater opportunities for the commission’s licensees to participate in major professional championship boxing contests in the State of California.

(2) What role may public-private partnerships play that may lead to greater opportunities for the commission’s licensees to participate in major professional championship boxing contests in the State of California.

(3) What actions may local agencies take that may lead to greater opportunities for the commission’s licensees to participate in major professional championship boxing contests in the State of California.

(4) What actions may the commission take that may lead to greater opportunities for the commission’s licensees to participate in major professional championship boxing contests in the State of California.

(5) What actions may other state agencies take that may lead to greater opportunities
 for the commission’s licensees to participate in major professional championship boxing contests in the State of California.

(b) The stakeholders shall include, but not be limited to, boxing promoters, boxing event venues, boxers, sports news outlets, and local agencies that have an interest in providing greater opportunities for the commission’s licensees to participate in major professional championship boxing contests in the State of California.

(c) Nothing in this section shall jeopardize the commission’s duties and responsibilities to protect the safety and welfare of boxers and the public.

(d) Costs incurred by the commission in implementing this section shall be covered by existing resources of the
 commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 370, Sec. 3.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18641.

The commission may license clubs to conduct, hold, or give, and shall license referees, judges, matchmakers, and timekeepers, and may license assistant matchmakers and corporation treasurers, to participate in, or be employed in connection with, professional or amateur boxing contests, sparring matches, or exhibitions.

No club may conduct, hold, or give, and no person performing tasks for which licensure is required by the commission may participate in, or be employed in connection with, those boxing contests, sparring matches, or exhibitions unless the club or person has been licensed for that purpose by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18642.

The commission may license professional and amateur boxers, professional and amateur martial arts fighters, and booking agents, managers of professional boxers and professional martial arts fighters, trainers, chief seconds, and seconds of each.

No person shall participate in any contest or serve in the capacity of a booking agent, manager, trainer, or second, unless he or she has been licensed for that purpose by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 370, Sec. 4.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18642.5.

A professional boxer or martial arts fighter shall, prior to licensure by the commission, demonstrate his or her ability to perform. If at any time a licensed boxer of fighter’s ability to perform is questionable the commission shall revalidate the licensee using standards adopted in regulation by the commission.

The commission may accept whatever evidence is available to demonstrate the “ability to perform” at the initial time of licensure. However, all commission evaluations or reevaluations shall be recorded on a form approved by the commission and maintained with the fighter’s licensing file.

The evaluation or reevaluation may be used by the commission when approving bouts for not more than 120 days from the date of the evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18645.

(a) There is hereby created within the jurisdiction of the State Athletic Commission an Advisory Committee on Medical and Safety Standards.

(b) The committee shall consist of six licensed physicians and surgeons appointed by the commission, including at least one licensed physician and surgeon certified in neurology by a specialty board that is a member board of the American Board of Medical Specialties. The commission may call meetings of those physicians and surgeons at such times and places as it deems appropriate for the purpose of studying and recommending medical and safety standards for the conduct of boxing, wrestling, and martial arts contests.

(c) It shall require a majority vote of the
 commission to appoint a person to the committee. Each appointment shall be at the pleasure of the commission for a term not to exceed four years.

(d) A majority of the appointed members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 486, Sec. 3.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18645.1.

(a) (1) The commission shall establish, by regulation, a review and approval process for applicants or licensees under this chapter who test positive for hepatitis C pursuant to the required blood tests described in Section 280 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The commission may consult with the Advisory Committee on Medical and Safety Standards to establish the review and approval process described in paragraph (1).

(b) An applicant or licensee under this chapter shall not be prohibited from competing in any contest, match, or exhibition on the basis of testing positive for hepatitis C, pursuant to Section 280 of Title 4 of the
 California Code of Regulations, if the applicant or licensee has been approved by the commission under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 486, Sec. 4.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18646.

(a) This chapter applies to all amateur boxing, wrestling, and full contact martial arts contests.

(b) The commission may, however, authorize one or more nonprofit boxing, wrestling, or martial arts clubs, organizations, or sanctioning bodies, upon approval of its bylaws, to administer its rules for amateur boxing, wrestling, and full contact martial arts contests, and may, therefore, waive direct commission application of laws and rules, including licensure, subject to the commission’s affirmative finding that the standards and enforcement of similar rules by a club, organization, or sanctioning body meet or exceed the safety and fairness standards of the commission. The commission shall review the performance of any such
 club, organization, or sanctioning body annually.

(c) Every contest subject to this section shall be preceded by a physical examination, specified by the commission, of every contestant. A physician and surgeon shall be in attendance at the contest. There shall be a medical insurance program satisfactory to the commission provided by an amateur club, organization, or sanctioning body in effect covering all contestants. The commission shall review compliance with these requirements.

(d) Any club, organization, or sanctioning body that conducts, holds, or gives amateur contests pursuant to this section, which collects money for the event, shall furnish a written financial report of receipts and disbursements within 90 days of the event.

(e) The commission has the right to have present without charge or restriction such